North Carolina, session 2025, SB1009.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 113A-115.1 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 113A-115.2. Regulation of erosion control structures.
The Commission shall not prohibit the placement or construction of temporary or permanent
erosion control structures. The Commission shall, however, adopt rules to regulate the placement,
construction, maintenance, and permitting of erosion control measures to ensure that an erosion
control structure will not result in significant adverse impacts to private property or to the public
recreational beach. In making this finding, the Commission shall take into account (i) the
potential benefits of the project, including protection of beaches, protective dunes, wildlife
habitats, roads, homes, and infrastructure, and (ii) mitigation measures that will be incorporated
into a project's design to prevent the potential for adverse impacts. For purposes of this section,
"erosion control structure" means a breakwater, bulkhead, groin, jetty, revetment, seawall, or any
similar structure."
SECTION 3. The Commission shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to
implement G.S. 113A-115.2, as enacted by Section 2 of this act. Temporary rules shall be
adopted no later than August 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. The Department of Environmental Quality shall amend the
management program it adopted pursuant to the federal Coastal Zone Management Act, 16
U.S.C. § 1451, et seq., to ensure the management program is consistent with the repeal of
G.S. 113A-115.1, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and G.S. 113A-115.2, as enacted by Section
2 of this act, and shall seek approval of the proposed amended management plan by the United
States Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary's authorized designee no later than six months
after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. The sum of eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the
North Carolina Collaboratory at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory)
to update the State's Beach and Inlet Management Plan (Plan), notwithstanding subsections (c)
and (d) of Section 13.9 of S.L. 2000-67. The updated Plan should catalog current erosion
concerns along the State's oceanfront and estuarine shorelines, evaluate the dredging needs of
*S1009-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
inlets and navigational channels, and recommend a prioritized schedule of maintenance dredging
projects with beneficial placement of beach-compatible material. In conducting this work, the
Collaboratory shall coordinate with the Division of Coastal Management of the Department of
Environmental Quality, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, and other knowledgeable
coastal authorities. Funds appropriated to the Collaboratory under this section may be used for
consultants or faculty, staff, or students affiliated with institutions of higher education to carry
out the Plan update. The Collaboratory shall issue the updated Plan no later than later than
December 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective September 1, 2026, and
apply to applications for erosion control structures submitted on or after that date. The remainder
of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1009-First Edition